Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.46
Powdered alcohol, defined.

Powdered alcohol means alcohol prepared in a powdered form for either direct use or consumption after the powder is combined with a liquid.

Laws 2015, LB330, § 7.